Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 39.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201086-506
Enterprise project,
defined.

Enterprise project means an endeavor
undertaken by an enterprise over
a fixed period of time using information technology, which would have a significant
effect on a core business function or which affects
multiple government programs, agencies, or institutions. Enterprise project
includes all aspects of planning, design, implementation, project management,
and training relating to the endeavor.

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 276;

Laws 2008, LB823, § 2;

Laws 2010, LB1071, § 39.
April 15, 2010